Mississippi, session 2026, HB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 81-3-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 81-3-15.  The charter or articles of incorporation of banking corporations heretofore created or that may hereafter be created, may be renewed or amended in the following manner: The stockholders in a special or regular meeting, shall first, by a vote of a majority in amount of all stock outstanding, adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed renewal or amendment, subject to the approval of the * * *state comptroller commissioner.  Three (3) copies of such resolution duly certified by the president or vice-president of such bank shall be forwarded to the * * * state comptroller commissioner for his or her approval, together with the fee required by statute.  If the proposed amendment is approved by the * * *state comptroller commissioner, he or she shall attach his or her certificate of approval to each of the copies and forward all three (3) copies * * * to the Attorney General for his approval, and * * *shall forward the fee required by statute to the Secretary of State.  * * * If and when approved by the Attorney General, all three copies of said amendment shall be forwarded to the Governor for his approval, and when approved by him shall be forwarded by the Governor to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall retain one (1) copy and file and record the same in his or her office.  He or she shall forward one (1) copy thereof to the * * *state comptroller commissioner, who shall retain and file the same in his or her office.  The remaining copy shall be returned to the bank, and the bank shall immediately record the same in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the bank is domiciled.  * * *Said Such copy, after being so recorded, shall be returned to the bank and retained by it in its files.  It shall not be necessary to publish such renewal or amendment. SECTION 2.  Section 81-5-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 81-5-75.  * * *No state bank shall declare or pay any dividend upon its common stock unless such bank has received written approval by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance. A state bank may, from time to time, declare and pay dividends not inconsistent with the bank's articles of incorporation or bylaws.  However, prior written approval of the commissioner is required if any of the following conditions exist: (a)  The bank is subject to a corrective plan or enforcement action; or (b)  After making the dividend, the bank would be undercapitalized.  The definition of "undercapitalized" shall be consistent with the definition used by the applicable federal regulatory agency; or (c)  The commissioner has determined that conditions exist at the bank, posing a risk to its safety and soundness.   Directors declaring a dividend in violation of the provisions of this section shall be personally liable to the full amount of the dividend so declared and it shall be the duty of the commissioner, upon discovering the payment of any such dividend, to forthwith make demand upon the directors that the same be restored to the bank, and upon their failure so to do he shall cause suit to be brought against them in the chancery court of the county in which the bank is located, either in his name or in the name of the bank, to recover the same for the benefit of the bank. SECTION 3.  Section 81-5-100, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 81-5-100.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meaning herein described unless the context shall otherwise require: (a)  "Electronic terminal" means an * * *unmanned electronic device owned or operated by a federally insured bank or thrift through which a consumer may initiate an electronic fund transfer automated, virtually staffed or unstaffed banking facility owned or operated by, or operated exclusively for, a federally insured bank or thrift, such as an automated teller machine (ATM), interactive teller machine (ITM), cash dispensing machine or other remote electronic terminal, that is open to the general public and at which deposits are accepted, cash dispersed, money lent or an electronic fund transfer is initiated.  An "electronic terminal" is not a "branch" within the meaning of Title 81, Mississippi Code of 1972, and is not subject to state licensing requirements. (b)  "Electronic fund transfer" means any of the following: (i)  The withdrawal of cash from or the deposit of cash or checks into an * * *unmanned electronic device electronic terminal, such as an * * *automatic automated teller machine, but not including night depositories; (ii)  An application for or acceptance of a loan through use of an * * *unmanned electronic device electronic terminal; (iii)  The transfer of funds between accounts through use of an * * *unmanned electronic device electronic terminal; or (iv)  The issuance of a check by an * * *unmanned electronic device electronic terminal. (c)  "Electronic fund transfer" does not mean access to accounts, the application for or acceptance of a loan, the transfer of funds between accounts or other banking services accomplished through the use of a personal computer or telephone. (d)  "Interactive teller machine" or "ITM" means an automated, virtually staffed or unstaffed facility, owned or operated by, or operated exclusively for, a federally insured bank or thrift, and equipped with video-based interactive technology allowing customers to conduct transactions and financial services driven by a centrally based teller, in a real time video or audio interaction. (2)  * * *A The establishment of electronic terminals are matters to be determined by a state bank or thrift in its discretion, according to sound banking judgment and safe and sound banking principles.  No prior approval of the commissioner is required for a state bank or thrift * * *, with the approval of the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, may to establish or decommission electronic terminals. * * * (3)  A bank desiring to establish such an electronic terminal shall file with the commissioner a written application requesting authority to establish such a terminal. Upon receipt of such application, the commissioner shall make inquiry into the facts sufficient to enable him to determine whether or not the proposed electronic terminal will provide bank customers with convenient access to the electronic transfer of funds. If the commissioner's finding is favorable to the application, he shall grant the applicant a written permit to establish the terminal. These rights are extended to national banks upon the approval of the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States of America. ( * * *43)  For the use of its electronic terminals connected to sharing networks or systems, a bank may impose a fee if imposition of the fee is disclosed at a time and in a manner that allows a user to terminate or cancel the transaction without incurring the transaction fee.  * * *Such fee shall not exceed Two Dollars ($2.00) or four percent (4%) of the gross amount of the transaction, whichever is greater. Because this power is an inherent element of a state bank's authority to conduct the business of banking, the setting or changing of such fee amount is a matter to be determined by a state bank or thrift in its discretion, according to sound banking judgment and safe and sound banking principles. An agreement to share electronic terminals shall not prohibit, limit or restrict the right of a bank to charge such fees for the use of its electronic terminals as allowed by state or federal law, or require a bank to limit or waive its rights or obligations under this section. SECTION 4.  The following shall be codified as Section 81-5-26, Mississippi Code of 1972: 81-5-26.  Community and economic development entities, community development projects, and other public welfare investments as legal investments. Investments in community and economic development entities, community development projects, and other public welfare investments as described in 12 USC 24 (Eleventh) and 12 CFR Part 24, and any amendments thereto, shall be legal investments for state chartered banks and trust companies, to the same extent that such are authorized investments for national banks under 12 USC 24 (Eleventh) and 12 CFR Part 24, and any amendments thereto.  Required notifications and approval requests shall be submitted to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, except that "eligible banks" as defined in Section 81-3-1 shall be exempt from any notification requirements and approval requests. SECTION 5.  Section 81-5-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 81-5-85.  A bank chartered by the State of Mississippi, may, with the approval of the commissioner, enter into a business combination with another bank, savings bank, savings and loan association or other entity, on such terms and conditions, as may be lawfully agreed upon, adopted and approved in a plan of merger or share exchange in accordance with Article 11, Chapter 4 of Title 79, Mississippi Code of 1972, and provided that the survivor is a financial institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.  Following receipt of the required corporate approvals and approval of the plan of merger or share exchange plan by the commissioner, the resulting amendments to charters of the survivor shall be approved and filed with other state officials in accordance with Section 81-3-15. The capital stock of the survivor shall not be less than that required under applicable law for the survivor.  And all the rights, franchises and interests of the institutions so consolidated in and to every species of property, personal and mixed, and choses in action thereto belonging, shall be deemed to be transferred to and vested in such survivor without any deed or other transfer, and the said survivor shall hold and enjoy the same and all rights of property, franchises and interests in the same manner and to the same extent as were held and enjoyed by the institutions so combined. A bank chartered by the State of Mississippi may, with the approval of the commissioner, sell or transfer all, or substantially all, of its assets, liabilities, and businesses only to another bank, savings bank, savings and loan association or other entity, in a transaction agreed upon, adopted and approved in accordance with Article 12, Chapter 4, Title 79, Mississippi Code of 1972, and provided that the buyer or transferee is a financial institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Any national bank, state or federal savings and loan association, or state or federal savings bank may apply for conversion into a state-chartered bank upon the affirmative vote of the shareholders owning at least two-thirds (2/3) of its capital stock outstanding, or of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the total number of the members, at a meeting called by the directors, notice of which, specifying the purpose, shall be given the manner required by the bylaws, or in the absence of such bylaw, then by sending the notice to each shareholder of record by registered mail at least ten (10) days before the meeting.  Upon such affirmative vote, the converting institution may apply for a certificate of authority by filing with the commissioner a certificate signed by its president and cashier which sets forth the corporate action herein prescribed and asserts that the institution has complied with the provisions of the laws of the United States.  The converting institution shall also file with the commissioner the plan of conversion and the proposed amendments to its articles of incorporation as approved by the stockholders for the operation of the institution as a state bank.  Upon receipt of the prescribed application, the commissioner shall examine all facts associated with the conversion.  The expenses and cost incurred for such special examination shall be paid by the institution applying for permission to convert.  The commissioner shall present his findings and recommendations to the State Board of Banking Review for consideration.  Upon approval by the State Board of Banking Review, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of authority to the applicant allowing the conversion to proceed. Any bank, savings and loan association or savings bank chartered by the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized to convert into, consolidate with, or merge with a national bank, with the national bank charter surviving, without approval of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, or any state authority whatsoever. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if any bank, savings and loan association or savings bank chartered by the State of Mississippi has or proposes to engage in a business combination or sale or transfer of substantially all assets that is not authorized under this section, the commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this section by issuing a cease-and-desist order. The bank, savings and loan association or savings bank may appeal such order to the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  Said appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days from the date the order was issued. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.